Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202655-606
Report; when required; contents.

The Commission on Military and Veteran Affairs shall prepare a report at the request of the Governor or upon the commission's own determination summarizing the military assets of Nebraska, including installations and missions, and the economic impact of the military assets in Nebraska. The report shall also include recommendations for preserving and sustaining military assets and missions existing in Nebraska and recommendations for actions which the state can take to encourage expanding such assets and missions. The commission shall submit the report electronically to the Legislature, the Governor, and the commanding officer of every military base in Nebraska.

Laws 2016, LB754, § 6;

Laws 2026, LB787, § 2.
July 18, 2026